Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.31
Retailer, defined.

Retailer means a person
who sells or offers for sale alcoholic liquor for use or consumption and not
for resale in any form except as provided in section 53-175.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 39.